District of Columbia statutes.
44-422

Repealed

Applicability.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 22a
as added June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 2002(e), 49 DCR 11664
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 317, 56 DCR 1117
Dangerous dogs, “locally assisted housing accommodation for the elderly or handicapped” defined, see § 8-2201.
Long-term care ombudsman program, records, permitted access, see § 7-703.02.
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2002(e) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2002(e) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2(h) of Health Services Planning and Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-49, March 28, 2003, 50 DCR 2943).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2(h) of Health Services Planning and Development Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-87, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4325).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(h) of Health Services Planning and Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-322, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1581).